Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 8 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Eastern Oregon Border  Economic Development Region” or “region,” as defined in
rules adopted by the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board  in consultation
with the Oregon Business Development Department, means that part of the state that:
(a) Is within 20 miles  of the Oregon border with the State of Idaho, and that includes,
but is not limited to, the cities of Ontario, Vale and Nyssa;
(b) Includes Willow Creek and Brogan;
(c) Is an area in Oregon that is across the Oregon border from Weiser, Idaho; and
(d) Is an area southwest of Vale for a distance of 10 miles.
(2) “Economic development” means development that:
(a) Relates to and supports:
(A) The economic health or recovery of the region;
(B) Business enterprise and activities in the region; or
(C) Development or certification of regionally significant industrial sites in the region;
(b) Creates jobs or prevents the loss of jobs in the region; or
(c) Promotes or expands businesses or prevents the decline of businesses  located or to
be located in the region.
(3) “Local governing body” means either the county court  or board of county commis-
sioners of the county.
(4) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(5) “Regionally significant industrial site” has the meaning  given that term in ORS
285B.626.
(6) “Traded sector” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.010.
(7) “Workforce development” means  activities or services that assist individuals to attain
employment, progress along career pathways or establish and maintain businesses and  that
promote economic development by making skilled employees  more readily available.
“Workforce development” includes:
(a) Education, training and apprenticeships;
(b) Labor market analysis;
(c) Employment and reemployment assistance;
(d) Employee recruitment and retention;
Enrolled House Bill 2012 (HB 2012-B) Page 1
(e) Workforce programs  that have a primary mission of helping individuals become em-
ployed, retain employment, increase wages, progress along career pathways or establish  and
maintain businesses; and
(f) Convening, coordinating, oversight and evaluation activities and services for business
and state workforce agencies.
SECTION 2. (1) The Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board is  established
to formulate  and implement strategies and practices for strategic investment in workforce
development and economic development in  the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Develop-
ment Region and to make grants or loans to eligible applicants for  the purpose of encour-
aging workforce development and economic development in the region.
(2) The board shall consist of seven voting members and one  nonvoting member as fol-
lows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint seven voting members from  a list of eligible appointees
with expertise in traded sector business, education,  workforce development or economic de-
velopment provided by the local governing bodies within the Eastern Oregon Border Eco-
nomic Development Region. The  Governor shall request an updated list of eligible appointees
from the local governing bodies  within the region for the purpose of making appointments
when vacancies occur.
(b) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department, or  the director’s
designee, is an ex officio nonvoting member of the board.
(3) The term of office of each voting  member of the board is four years, but a member
serves at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term  of a voting
member, the Governor shall appoint a successor whose term begins on  January 1 next fol-
lowing. A  member is eligible for reappointment for a total of two consecutive terms. If there
is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor  shall make an appointment to become immediately
effective for the unexpired term.
(4) The Governor shall appoint one voting member of the board as the chairperson.
(5) A voting member of the board is  entitled to compensation and expenses as provided
in ORS 292.495.
(6) A majority of the voting members of the board  constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(7)(a) The board shall meet  at least once every three months at a time and place deter-
mined by the chairperson. The board also may meet at other times  and places specified by
the call of the chairperson or of a majority of the members of the board.
(b) Meetings of the board are subject to ORS 192.610 to 192.690 governing public meetings
and ORS 192.410 to 192.505 governing public records.
(8) The board may establish any advisory or technical committees the board considers
necessary to aid and advise the board in the performance  of its functions. The committees
may be continuing or temporary committees. The board  shall determine the representation,
membership, terms and organization  of the committees and shall appoint the members of the
committees.
(9) The Oregon Business Development  Department shall provide staff to the board as
necessary to allow the board to carry  out the board’s responsibilities under sections 1 to 8
of this 2017 Act. The department may contract with a third party  to provide staff to the
board under this subsection, provided that  the third party remains subject to the direction
and control of the department.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding the term of office specified by  section 2 of this 2017 Act,
of the voting members first appointed to the board:
(1) Two shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2018.
(2) Two shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2019.
(3) Two shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2020.
(4) One shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 2012 (HB 2012-B) Page 2
SECTION 4.  The Eastern  Oregon Border Economic Development Board, in collaboration
with and with the assistance of the Oregon Business Development  Department, has the fol-
lowing duties, functions and powers:
(1) To identify policies and strategies that will:
(a) Promote workforce and economic growth;
(b) Facilitate development or prevent decline of regionally significant industrial sites;
(c) Create or  maintain jobs in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region;
and
(d) Improve access to career and technical  education, workforce training programs and
higher education to enhance the availability of  a qualified workforce for employers in the
region.
(2) To make recommendations to the Legislative Assembly for policies and strategies that
improve the availability of  career and technical education, workforce training programs and
higher education for the purpose of improving the availability of a qualified workforce  for
employers in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region.
(3) To identify specific laws, rules and  regulations that place specific workforce develop-
ment or economic development efforts in the Eastern  Oregon Border Economic Development
Region at a competitive  disadvantage to the same type of efforts in the areas across the
Oregon border as described in section 5 of this 2017 Act.
(4) Subject to the availability of  funds in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Develop-
ment Board Fund,  to make grants or loans to qualified applicants pursuant to section 6 of
this 2017 Act, not to exceed a total of 10 active grants at any one time.
(5) To establish a means to evaluate grants or loans made by the board  and the depart-
ment, including, but not limited to,  the number of businesses or regionally significant in-
dustrial sites assisted, the types and amount of resources leveraged, return on investment
criteria, performance and  outcome measures and methods to evaluate the impact on jobs and
wages in the area of  the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region to which
grant or loan moneys were applied or utilized.
(6) To facilitate collaboration among employers,  local governments, state agencies and
stakeholders for the purpose of enhancing and expanding  workforce development and eco-
nomic development in the region.
(7) To consult with affected school districts, community colleges and universities and  the
Employment Department in identifying policies and strategies that will  enhance and promote
workforce development to improve the availability of a qualified workforce  for employers in
the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region.
(8) To report annually  on or before December 31 of each year to standing and interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to business and economic development  re-
garding implementation and administration of the  Eastern Oregon Border Economic Devel-
opment Board and grants or  loans made by the board and the Oregon Business Development
Department pursuant to section 6 of this 2017 Act. The report  may include recommendations
regarding proposed  legislation and strategies to improve workforce development and eco-
nomic development in the region.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development  Board may identify
specific laws,  rules and regulations that repeatedly place specific workforce development or
economic development efforts in the  Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region
at a competitive disadvantage to the  same type of efforts in the areas across the Oregon
border. Upon identifying a specific law, rule or regulation, the board:
(a) May recommend to the agency, board or commission that imposes such a  law, rule
or regulation that the agency, board or  commission consider an exception or waiver to the
law, rule or regulation, where permitted by law, to assist in workforce  development and
economic development efforts in the region. Within 60 days  of receiving a recommendation
from the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board  under this paragraph, the
Enrolled House Bill 2012 (HB 2012-B) Page 3
agency, board or commission shall review the recommendation and hold a public hearing  in
the region or  otherwise consider information from the public and stakeholder entities to
determine whether:
(A) The law, rule or regulation  has posed a repeated disadvantage to workforce develop-
ment and economic development in the  region in the last five years compared to comparable
laws, rules or regulations applied in Idaho; and
(B) An exception or waiver to the specific law,  rule or regulation can be made for the
purpose of furthering workforce  development or economic development in the Eastern
Oregon Border Economic Development Region.
(b) If the agency, board or  commission determines that an exception or waiver may not
be made under paragraph (a) of this  subsection, may recommend to the agency, board or
commission or to the Legislative  Assembly that a specific exception or waiver be allowed for
the purpose of workforce development or economic development in the region.
(2) The Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development  Board may not recommend an
exception or waiver to a  specific law, rule or regulation that is related to employment or
state taxation.
SECTION 6. (1) Subject to the availability of funds in the  Eastern Oregon Border Eco-
nomic Development Board Fund, the Eastern  Oregon Border Economic Development Board
may award grants or loans to eligible applicants to enhance  and expand workforce develop-
ment or economic development in  the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Re-
gion. Repayment of loans made under this section is subject to subsection (8) of this section.
The board shall make the decision to approve and award grants or  loans under this section,
but the Oregon Business Development Department  shall be responsible for the actual pay-
ment of the grants or loans from the Eastern Oregon Border  Economic Development Board
Fund.
(2) Eligible applicants include, but are not limited to:
(a) Local governments;
(b) Institutions of higher education as defined in ORS 348.582;
(c) Private or nonprofit businesses with their principal places of business or the majority
of their workforces located in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region;
(d) Small business development centers established under ORS 285B.165 to 285B.171;
(e) Economic development organizations;
(f) School districts; and
(g) Other entities as defined by the board by rule.
(3) An eligible  applicant may apply for a grant or loan by submitting an application and
paying the required application fee, if any, in accordance with rules adopted  by the board in
consultation with the department. The rules must, at a minimum:
(a) Establish criteria for the award  of grants or loans under this section that provide
that the applicant must demonstrate the grant or loan moneys will be used for:
(A) Economic development that will lead to  private investment, job creation or retention
and the establishment or expansion of viable businesses in the region;
(B) Expansion of a transportation infrastructure sufficient to facilitate moving traded
sector goods or services in the region to market;
(C) Enhancement and  expansion of workforce development in the region that is respon-
sive to the needs of the region’s businesses and industries;
(D) Certification of regionally significant industrial sites within the region;
(E) Extension  of private utilities, including but not limited to gas and electrical con-
nections, to regionally significant industrial sites within the region;
(F) A due diligence assessment pursuant to the  Oregon Industrial Site Readiness As-
sessment Program under ORS 285B.635 to  285B.640 or other assessments or evaluations that
prepare a site for development; or
Enrolled House Bill 2012 (HB 2012-B) Page 4
(G) Provision of support services and technical assistance  to entrepreneurs and business
owners in the region, including but not limited to  small business development centers es-
tablished under ORS 285B.165 to 285B.171; and
(b) Establish criteria for repayment of loans, collection  of moneys owed and repayment
of grant proceeds in the event of default.
(4) Applications for loans must contain:
(a) A plan for repayment by the applicant  to the Eastern Oregon Border Economic De-
velopment Board Fund of moneys borrowed from the fund plus interest; and
(b) If required by the department  and the board, evidence of debt assurance of, or secu-
rity for, repayment by the applicant.
(5) Loans made under this section:
(a) May not be for a loan  term that exceeds the usable life of the work or project for
which the loan  funds will be used or a specified number of years from completion, whichever
is less; and
(b) Are subject to subsection (8) of this  section regarding repayment of loans made by
the department.
(6) Grants or loans made under this section are payable solely from  the Eastern Oregon
Border Economic Development Board Fund established under section 8 of  this 2017 Act.
Amounts paid as grants or loans shall not constitute a  debt of the state or a lending of the
credit of the state within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation,  although
nothing in this section is  intended to impair the exercise of rights granted against the se-
curity for a loan, if any.
(7) The department shall assist  the board in evaluating applications for grants or loans
under this section by:
(a) Evaluating timelines for accomplishment  of work and projects for which grant or loan
moneys requested in the application will be used;
(b) Investigating whether necessary permits for development, if  needed, have been or can
be secured in a timely manner;
(c) Recommending how to maximize use of grant or loan moneys to ensure successful
completion of the work or project for which the grant or loan moneys will be used;
(d) Assessing the ability of the applicant to repay the grant or loan;
(e) Documenting the strengths, weaknesses and risks of the applicant and project; and
(f) Making recommendations regarding terms and conditions for approval of a grant or
loan.
(8) The department  shall adopt rules governing repayment of loans made under this
section and collection of moneys owed the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development
Board Fund. The department may seek appropriate legal remedies to secure  repayment of
any loans made under this section that are due to the fund.
(9) The department  may assess and charge fees, including but not limited to application
fees, for loans or grants made under this section.
SECTION 7.
 The Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development  Board, in consultation
with the Oregon Business Development Department, shall  adopt rules to implement and ad-
minister the provisions of sections 1 to 8 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) The Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board Fund is  es-
tablished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest
earned by the  Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board Fund shall be credited
to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department for the use of the Eastern Oregon Border Economic  Development Board
for the purposes  set forth in sections 1 to 8 of this 2017 Act, including but not limited to
administrative costs of the department incurred in  processing grant or loan applications,
investigating the eligibility of applicants and servicing outstanding  grants and loans, not to
Enrolled House Bill 2012 (HB 2012-B) Page 5
exceed an annual amount greater  than the total revenues received in that year from appli-
cant fees assessed and charged  by the department under section 6 of this 2017 Act, plus four
percent of the total asset value of the fund.
(3) Moneys in the Eastern  Oregon Border Economic Development Board Fund consist of:
(a) Applicant  fees for grants or loans assessed, charged and paid pursuant to section 6
of this 2017 Act;
(b) Moneys received as repayment of principal and interest on loans made  from the fund
under sections 1 to 8 of this 2017 Act;
(c) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly;
(d) Amounts donated to the fund;
(e) Moneys transferred to the fund  from the federal government, state agencies or local
governments;
(f) Lottery bond proceeds approved by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in the fund;
(g) Earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(h) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(4) All repayments of grants or loans, interest and other receipts from outstanding
indebtedness or any other sources shall be retained and accumulated in the fund  and shall
be used for the purposes set forth in sections 1 to 8 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 9.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the  biennium beginning July 1,
2017, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for deposit in the Eastern Oregon
Border Economic Development Board Fund established by section 8 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 10. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2012 (HB 2012-B) Page 6